test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pââll â-stem: # Noun 'fear/pelko' - full paradigm
     pââll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pââll
     pââll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pââl
     pââll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pââl
     pââll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: põllu
     pââll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: pââlast
     pââll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: pââlain
     pââll+N+Ess+Indef: pââllan
     pââll+N+Par+Indef: pââllad
     pââll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [pââltaa, pââltää]
     pââll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pââl
     pââll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: pââlai
     pââll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: pââlaid
     pââll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: pââlaid
     pââll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: pââlain
     pââll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: pââlaivuiʹm
     pââll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [pââlaitaa, pââlaitää]
